Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-924
Injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandamus.

If the director believes that any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of the Delayed Deposit Services Licensing Act or a violation of any rule, regulation, or order of the director thereunder, the director may initiate an action in the district court of Lancaster County to enjoin such acts or practices and to enforce compliance with the act or any order under the act. Upon a proper showing a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandamus shall be granted or a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant's assets. The director shall not be required to post a bond.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 24.